North Carolina statutes. Chapter 136. Transportation.
Article 5. Bridges.

§ 136-72.
Load limits for bridges; penalty for violations.

The Department of Transportation shall have authority to determine the safe load-carrying capacity for any and all bridges on highways on the State highway system. It shall be unlawful for any person, firm, or corporation to drive, operate or tow on any bridge on the State highway system, any vehicle or combination of vehicles with a gross weight exceeding the safe load-carrying capacity established by the Department of Transportation and posted at each end of the said bridge. Any person, firm, or corporation violating the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

1931, c. 145, s. 16; 1933, c. 172, s. 17; 1957, c. 65, s. 11; 1973, c. 507, s. 5; 1975, c. 373, s. 1; 1977, c. 306; c. 464, s. 7.1; 1993, c. 539, s. 985; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

§§ 136-73 through 136-75.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1979, c. 114, s. 1.

§ 136-76.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1965, c. 492.

§ 136-76.1.
Bridge replacement program.

The Department of Transportation is hereby directed to replace all bridges on the State highway system containing long through truss spans over 125 feet long with less than a 12 feet clear roadway width. The Department shall initiate a bridge replacement program as soon as possible and shall complete the replacement program of all such bridges by June 30, 1980. All such bridges now on the State highway system shall be replaced except those on roads where the traffic volume is low and the elimination of the bridge would be a minimum inconvenience to the public and the replacement cannot be justified. Such bridges not replaced shall be removed and taken off the State highway system. Provided, that the provisions of this subsection shall not apply to any bridge which has not been removed and replaced by June 30, 1980; these bridges shall continue to be included in the State Highway System, and shall be examined, repaired if necessary, updated and put into usable condition with weight limitations as safety may require.

The Environment [Environmental] Policy Act contained in Article 1 of Chapter 113A shall not apply to the bridge replacement program provided for by this section.

History.

1975, c. 889; 1977, c. 464, s. 7.1; 1981, c. 861.

§ 136-76.2.
Bridge program.

Establishment. — The Department of Transportation shall rename the “system preservation program” the “bridge program”.

Permissible Uses. — Funds appropriated, allocated, credited, or otherwise transferred to the bridge program established under subsection (a) of this section may only be used for improvements to culverts associated with a component of the State highway system and improvements to structurally deficient and functionally obsolete bridges. No more than ten percent (10%) of the funds described in this subsection may be used for improvements to culverts associated with a component of the State highway system, and the funds may only be used for culverts that are 54 inches or greater in size and rated by the Department as in poor condition.

Outsourcing. — Except for the following activities, all projects funded under the bridge program established under subsection (a) of this section shall be outsourced to private contractors:

Inspection.

Pre-engineering.

Contract preparation.

Contract administration and oversight.

Planning activities.

Installation of culverts described in subsection (b) of this section, but only in cases of emergency.

History.

2017-57, s. 34.10(b); 2017-197, s. 7.1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2017-197, s. 7.1, effective July 1, 2017, rewrote subsection (c), which read: “Outsourcing. — All projects funded under the bridge program established under subsection (a) of this section, with the exception of inspection, pre-engineering, contract preparation, contract administration and oversight, and planning activities, shall be outsourced to private contractors.”

§ 136-77.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1979, c. 114, s. 1.

§ 136-78.
Railroad companies to provide draws.

Railroad companies, erecting bridges across watercourses, shall attach and keep up good and sufficient draws, by which vessels may be allowed conveniently to pass.

History.

1846, c. 51, ss. 1, 2; R.C., c. 101, s. 32; Code, s. 2051; Rev., s. 2701; C.S., s. 3800.

§ 136-79.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1965, c. 491.

§ 136-80.
Fastening vessels to bridges misdemeanor.

If any person shall fasten any decked vessel or steamer to any bridge that crosses a navigable stream, he shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor, and in the case of a bridge that crosses a county line, may be prosecuted in either county.

History.

R.S., c. 104; R.C., c. 101, s. 31; 1858-9, c. 58, s. 1; Code, s. 2050; 1887, c. 93, s. 3; Rev., s. 3774; C.S., s. 3804; 1993, c. 539, s. 986; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

§ 136-81.
Department of Transportation may maintain footways.

The Department of Transportation shall have the power to erect and maintain adequate footways over swamps, waters, chasms, gorges, gaps, or in any other places whatsoever, whenever said Department of Transportation shall find that such footways are necessary, in connection with the use of the highways, for the safety and convenience of the public.

History.

1817, c. 940, ss. 1, 2, P.R; R.C., c. 101, s. 17; Code, s. 2029; Rev., s. 2695; C.S., s. 3785; 1921, c. 2; 1931, c. 145; 1933, c. 172, s. 17; 1957, c. 65, s. 11; 1973, c. 507, s. 5; 1977, c. 464, s. 7.1.